California, session 20252026, AB837.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11379.2 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11379.2. (a) Except as otherwise provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 4211) 4110) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, every person who possesses for sale or sells any a controlled substance specified in subdivision (g) of Section 11056 shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year or in the state prison. pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.(b) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a person who transports, imports into this state, furnishes, administers, or gives away, or offers to transport, import into this state, furnish, administer, or give away, or attempts to import into this state or transport a controlled substance specified in subdivision (g) of Section 11056, unless upon the written prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.(c) For purposes of this section, “transports” means to transport for sale.(d) This section does not preclude or limit the prosecution of an individual for aiding and abetting the commission of, conspiring to commit, or acting as an accessory to an act prohibited by this section.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 11352 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11352.(a)Except as otherwise provided in this division, a person who transports, imports into this state, sells, furnishes, administers, or gives away, or offers to transport, import into this state, sell, furnish, administer, or give away, or attempts to import into this state or transport (1) a controlled substance specified in subdivision (b), (c), or (e) of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of, Section 11054, specified in paragraph (14), (15), or (20) of subdivision (d) of Section 11054, or specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 11055, or specified in subdivision (g) or (h) of Section 11056, or (2) a controlled substance classified in Schedule III, IV, or V that is a narcotic drug, unless upon the written prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, or veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for three, four, or five years.(b)Notwithstanding the penalty provisions of subdivision (a), a person who transports a controlled substances specified in subdivision (a) within this state from one county to another noncontiguous county shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for three, six, or nine years.(c)For purposes of this section, “transports” means to transport for sale.(d)This section does not preclude or limit the prosecution of an individual for aiding and abetting the commission of, or conspiring to commit, or acting as an accessory to, an act prohibited by this section.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.